New York, session 2025-2026, S7394.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The agriculture and markets law is amended by adding a new 2 section 142-c to read as follows: 3 § 142-c. Labeling of native plant seeds. 1. For the purposes of this 4 section, the term "native plant seeds" shall have the same meaning as 5 defined by section one hundred forty-two-b of this article. 6 2. Any person, firm, corporation, distributor, or vendor that labels, 7 advertises, markets, offers for sale, or distributes seeds labeled as 8 native plant seeds within New York state shall be required to include on 9 the product packaging, or on documentation made available at the point 10 of sale or distribution of such seeds, the following information in a 11 clear and conspicuous manner: 12 (a) the original geographic location of collection or source zone of 13 such seeds, including state, region, or ecological zone, as applicable; 14 (b) a statement identifying the ecological region(s) within New York 15 state for which such seeds are most appropriate, based on adaptation and 16 suitability for restoration, conservation, or landscape use; 17 (c) the full scientific name of the species, subspecies, variety, 18 and/or cultivar, as applicable, of such seeds, consistent with recog- 19 nized botanical standards; 20 (d) whether such seeds are wild-collected, cultivated from wild-col- 21 lected stock, or produced through other means, and whether such seeds 22 are first-generation (G1) or further generations removed from wild popu- 23 lations; 24 (e) the calendar year in which such seeds were collected or harvested; 25 and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11631-01-5 S. 7394 2 1 (f) a unique code or number for lot traceability of such seeds, where 2 applicable. 3 3. The commissioner, in consultation with the commissioner of environ- 4 mental conservation, shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement 5 the provisions of this subdivision. Such rules and regulations shall 6 include, but not be limited to: 7 (a) standardized terminology and formatting requirements to ensure 8 consistency and consumer readability; 9 (b) criteria for ecological region identification and mapping, 10 informed by existing seed zones or ecoregions recognized by state or 11 federal agencies; 12 (c) requirements for seed suppliers or vendors to maintain records 13 verifying the accuracy of the information provided pursuant to subdivi- 14 sion two of this section, for a minimum of three years; 15 (d) procedures for inspection, compliance monitoring, and enforcement 16 actions, including penalties for misrepresentation or failure to comply 17 with the labeling requirements established under this section. 18 4. The commissioner shall make available on the department's website a 19 summary of the labeling requirements established pursuant to this 20 section and shall develop educational materials to be distributed to 21 seed vendors, nurseries, plant farms, conservation organizations, muni- 22 cipalities, and other relevant entities, including through the Cornell 23 cooperative extension and other horticultural and agricultural networks. 24 5. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the commissioner from estab- 25 lishing additional or more specific labeling or documentation standards 26 for particular classes of native plant seeds if deemed necessary for 27 consumer protection, ecological appropriateness, or regulatory clarity. 28 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 29 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 30 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 31 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 32 completed on or before such effective date.